District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.59

Repealed

Liquidation proceedings — Discontinuance.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 289, Pub. L. 87-569, § 59
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.59.
1981 Ed., § 29-560.
1973 Ed., § 29-1059.